Mississippi statutes. Title 53. Oil, Gas, and Other Minerals
Administration Expense Tax

§ 53-1-71.
Definitions for Sections 53-1-73 through 53-1-77.

As used in Sections 53-1-73 through 53-1-77:

The term “barrel of oil” shall be forty-two (42) United States standard gallons corrected to sixty (60) degrees Fahrenheit and all measurements for volume shall be in one hundred percent (100%) strappings.

“Cubic foot of gas” shall be that volume of gas which occupies one (1) cubic foot of space at a pressure of ten (10) ounces above an assumed atmospheric pressure of fourteen and four-tenths (14.4) pounds per square inch corrected to sixty (60) degrees Fahrenheit flowing temperature.

The term “person” shall mean any individual, corporation, partnership, association, or any state, municipality, political subdivision of any state, or any agency, department or instrumentality of the United States, or any other entity, or any officer, agent or employee of any of the above.

In addition to the customary meaning of oil, the term “oil” shall include any type of salvaged crude oil which, after any treatment, becomes marketable.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-44; Laws, 1948, ch. 318, § 4; Reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 485, § 25; Laws, 1983, ch. 503, § 2; Reenacted, Laws, 1990, ch. 357, § 25; Reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 340, § 25; Laws, 2009, ch. 443, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 53-1-73.
Charge imposed to pay for administration expenses.

For the purposes of paying the costs and expenses incurred in connection with the administration and enforcement of the oil and gas conservation laws of the State of Mississippi and of the rules, regulations and orders of the State Oil and Gas Board, there is levied and assessed against each barrel of oil produced in the State of Mississippi a charge not to exceed sixty (60) mills on each barrel of such oil sold, and against each one thousand (1,000) cubic feet of gas produced and sold a charge not to exceed six (6) mills on each one thousand (1,000) cubic feet of gas. The State Oil and Gas Board shall fix the amount of such charge in the first instances, and may, from time to time, change, reduce or increase the amount thereof, as in its judgment the charges against the fund may require, but the amounts fixed by the board shall not exceed the limits hereinabove prescribed; and it shall be the duty of the board to make collection of such assessments. All monies collected shall be used exclusively to pay the expenses and other costs in connection with the functioning of the State Oil and Gas Board and the administration of the oil and gas conservation laws of the State of Mississippi now in force or hereafter enacted and the rules, regulations and orders of the board.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-41; Laws, 1948, ch. 318, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 482, § 1; Laws, 1975, ch. 342; Laws, 1980, ch. 525; Laws, 1982, ch. 485, § 26; Laws, 1983, ch. 473; Reenacted and amended, Laws, 1990, ch. 357, § 26; Reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 340, § 26; Laws, 1997, ch. 543, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 363, § 3; Laws, 2009, ch. 443, § 5; Laws, 2016, ch. 459, § 40, eff from and after July 1, 2016; Laws, 2019, ch. 474, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 16, 2019).

§ 53-1-75.
Persons liable.

The persons owning an interest (working interest, royalty interest, payments out of production or any other interest) in the oil or gas subject to the charge provided in Section 53-1-73 shall be liable for the charge in proportion to their ownership at the time of production. The charge assessed and fixed in Section 53-1-73 shall be payable monthly on a well by well basis, and the persons required to remit the charge shall remit the sum due to the board on or before the twenty-fifth day of the month next following the month in which the production is sold out of which the assessment arises; the remittance shall comply with any rules and regulations which may be adopted by the board in regard thereto.

Remittances with respect to all production against which any assessment hereunder is levied shall be made by the following persons:

With respect to assessments against oil or gas purchased in this state at the well under any contract or agreement requiring payment for such production to the respective persons owning any interest therein (including working interests, royalty interests, payments out of production or any other interests in such production), by the person purchasing such production.

With respect to any oil, or gas purchased in this state at the well without any contract or agreement requiring payment for such production to respective persons owning an interest therein, and with respect to any oil or gas produced from any well but not sold at that well, by the operator of the well from which the production is obtained.

The persons remitting the charge required in this section are hereby authorized, empowered and required to deduct from any amounts due the persons owning an interest in the oil or gas at the time of production the proportionate amount of the charge before making payment to such owners.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-42; Laws, 1948, ch. 318, § 2; Reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 485, § 27; Reenacted, Laws, 1990, ch. 357, § 27; Reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 340, § 27; Laws, 2007, ch. 363, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 53-1-77.
Oil and gas conservation fund; use of excess funds to plug orphan oil or gas wells; emergency plugging fund; funding of agency expenses; deposit of monies into State General Fund [Subsection (8) repealed effective July 1, 2021].

The State Oil and Gas Supervisor, as ex officio secretary of such board, shall remit to the State Treasurer all monies collected by reason of the assessments made and fixed under the provisions of Section 53-1-73, and the State Treasurer shall deposit all such monies in a special fund known as the “Oil and Gas Conservation Fund,” which is continued in effect.

All monies on deposit in the Oil and Gas Conservation Fund on April 10, 1948, and all monies hereafter deposited in such fund, shall be held in trust for the use of the board to pay the expenses and costs incurred in connection with the administration and enforcement of the oil and gas conservation laws of the State of Mississippi and the rules, regulations and orders of the State Oil and Gas Board issued thereunder. Disbursements shall be made from such fund only upon requisition of the State Oil and Gas Supervisor, as approved and allowed by the board, and which requisitions shall be supported by itemized statements thereto attached showing the purpose or purposes of such expenditures. Such requisitions shall be drawn upon the State Fiscal Officer, who shall issue a warrant upon the fund. Such warrants so issued shall be paid by the State Treasurer upon presentation.

The State Oil and Gas Supervisor, as ex officio secretary of the Oil and Gas Board, shall submit, within ten (10) days, after the convening of each session of the Legislature, to the Legislature a detailed report of all receipts, expenditures and balance on hand, of funds coming to the Oil and Gas Board from any source whatsoever.

In the event that at any particular time, the Oil and Gas Conservation Fund contains an amount greater than Two Hundred Thousand Dollars ($200,000.00) more than the current fiscal year’s estimated budget, the amount of the excess may be used by the board and at the board’s discretion, to plug any oil or gas well, including any Class II well, in the state that has been determined by the board to represent an imminent threat to the environment and that has been determined by the board to be an “orphan” well.

The board shall have the authority, in its discretion, to use whatever legal means available to it to attempt to collect any amounts so expended from any responsible party. Any amounts so collected shall be returned to the Oil and Gas Board’s Emergency Plugging Fund created herein.

Amounts of surplus in the Oil and Gas Conservation Fund of over Two Hundred Thousand Dollars ($200,000.00) shall be transferred to a separate special fund of the Oil and Gas Board to be known as the Emergency Plugging Fund, for the proper plugging of wells pursuant to this section. The supervisor shall have the authority, and it shall be his duty to transfer any amounts in the Emergency Plugging Fund back to the Oil and Gas Conservation Fund in the event and to the extent to which the Oil and Gas Conservation Fund should at any time contain less than a Two Hundred Thousand Dollars ($200,000.00) surplus.

For purposes of this section, orphan well means any oil or gas well in the state, including Class II wells,that has not been properly plugged according to the requirements of the statutes, rules and regulations governing same and for which a responsible party such as an owner or operator cannot be located or for which, for whatever reason, there is no other party that can be forced to plug the well.

Upon request of the State Oil and Gas Supervisor and subject to the limitations set forth in Section 27-103-303(4), the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration may transfer funds from the Capital Expense Fund to the State Oil and Gas Board for the emergency plugging of any oil or gas well, including any Class II well, in the state that has been determined by the board to represent an imminent threat to the environment and that has been determined by the board to be an “orphan” well. This subsection (8) shall stand repealed from and after July 1, 2021.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-43; Laws, 1948, ch. 318, § 3; Reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 485, § 28; Reenacted, Laws, 1990, ch. 357, § 28; Reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 340, § 28; Laws, 1991, ch. 344 § 2; Laws, 2016, ch. 459, § 37; Laws, 2017, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 7, § 25, eff from and after passage (approved June 23, 2017); Laws, 2019, ch. 474, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 16, 2019).